Tennessee statutes. Title 34 Guardianship
Chapter 1 Guardianships and Conservatorships Generally
34-1-111. Accounting with court — Failure to account.

Except as provided in subsection (i), within thirty (30) days after the six-month anniversary of the fiduciary's date of appointment, the fiduciary shall file a sworn accounting with the court.

Except as provided in subsection (i), within sixty (60) days after each anniversary of the accounting required in subsection (a) or any other end of an accounting period selected by the fiduciary after the subsection (a) accounting, the fiduciary shall file a sworn accounting with the court. To select an accounting period end other than the end of the month during which the fiduciary was appointed, the fiduciary shall file a statement with the clerk advising of the accounting period selected. The accounting period shall not exceed twelve (12) months.

For good cause, the court may extend the time for filing the accounting.

The accounting shall itemize the receipts and the expenditures made during the period covered by the accounting. The same or similar items may be reported collectively. The accounting shall also detail the property held by the fiduciary at the end of the accounting period. To support the financial information reported, the fiduciary shall submit with the accounting:

Each bank statement, brokerage statement or other document reporting any financial information;

In connection with any accounting, to support the financial information reported, the fiduciary shall submit with the accounting the original of each cancelled check written on the account unless:

The fiduciary is a bank to which § 45-2-1002(c) would apply or a savings and loan association or credit union to which § 45-2-1002(c) would apply if the savings and loan association or credit union were a bank, in which case the fiduciary shall comply with § 45-2-1002(c); or

The fiduciary account is maintained in a “financial institution” as defined in § 34-1-101, that does not return the cancelled checks but provides a printed statement showing the date the check cleared, the payee and the amount, in which case the fiduciary shall submit a printed statement from the financial institution.

A copy of any United States and Tennessee income tax returns filed on behalf of the minor or person with a disability. If no United States or Tennessee income tax return is due, the fiduciary shall include a statement in the accounting that no such return is due and shall set forth the gross income of the minor or person with a disability, and include information from the Internal Revenue Code or Tennessee Code Annotated evidencing the availability of the claimed exemption; and

If the bond is secured by a corporate surety, a statement from the corporate surety that the bond is in force for the next annual period. The surety's liability under the bond shall not be cumulative and shall not exceed the sum of the bond in force at the time of default.

The accounting shall contain a statement concerning the physical or mental condition of the person with a disability, which statement shall demonstrate to the court the need, or lack of need, for the continuation of the fiduciary's services.

When the accounting has been confirmed, the clerk of the court shall return the original documentation required in subsection (c) to the fiduciary.

Unless the court has approved an extension of time for filing the accounting, if the fiduciary fails to file the accounting within the required time, the clerk shall promptly notify the fiduciary and the fiduciary's attorney of record. If after notice the accounting has not been filed thirty (30) days thereafter, the clerk shall cite the fiduciary to appear on a date certain and render the accounting. Upon failure to appear as cited, the fiduciary shall be summoned to appear before the court and show cause why the fiduciary should not be held in contempt.

Unless the court has authorized an extension of time to file the accounting, if a fiduciary who has been summoned does not respond within thirty (30) days of the date the summons was received by the fiduciary, the court may enter an order revoking the fiduciary's authority and appointing a substitute fiduciary.

On the failure of the fiduciary to account, the fiduciary may be charged with the value of the assets at the beginning of the year. The amount shall accrue interest at the prejudgment rate and compound annually until a proper accounting is made and approved. On the issuance of a show cause order and the failure of the fiduciary to appear and explain, the court shall allow the entry of judgment against the fiduciary and the fiduciary's surety for the amount unaccounted for, plus interest. The fiduciary's surety shall be given adequate notice and may appear and make defense.

Financial accountings may be excused in the discretion of the court, if the court makes a finding based on the evidence presented at a hearing that waiver of the accountings would be appropriate, would be in the best interest of the minor or person with a disability and that one (1) of the following exists:

The fiduciary holds no property of the minor or person with a disability and receives only fixed periodic payments, including, but not limited to, social security, veterans benefits or workers' compensation benefits, and the order appointing the fiduciary authorizes the fiduciary to apply the entire periodic payment to the needs of the minor or person with a disability. The fiduciary holds no property of the minor or person with a disability if the property of the minor or person with a disability is:

Deposited with the clerk and master or clerk of the court;

Placed with a financial institution and the fiduciary and the financial institution enter into a written agreement, filed with the court, in which the financial institution agrees it will not permit the fiduciary to withdraw the principal without court approval; or

The cost of the accounting would exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the income produced by the property held by the fiduciary.

Subdivision (d)(2) requiring a report regarding the physical or mental condition of the person with a disability may not be waived or excused.

This section does not apply to accountings filed pursuant to § 34-5-111, relating to veterans' guardians. The provisions of this section related to financial accountings do not apply to fiduciaries who do not have authority over the property of the person with a disability.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 12; 1994, ch. 855, §§ 4, 5, 16; 1998, ch. 762, § 3; T.C.A. §34-11-111; Acts 2013, ch. 435, §§ 16-20, 46.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (j), relating to conservators for property of disabled persons, who failed to file a final accounting, being given a grace period of six months after April 21, 1994, was deleted by the code commission as obsolete in 1996.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Law Reviews.

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

Collateral References.

Obligation of guardian in respect of services rendered by ward. 64 A.L.R. 692.

Rents and profits or use and occupation, duty of guardian who is also a cotenant to account for. 51 A.L.R.2d 388.

Third person, adjudication of account of guardian as prerequisite to remedy against, in respect of property transferred to him in breach of trust. 132 A.L.R. 1353.

34-1-112. Compensation to fiduciary.

The fiduciary may receive reasonable compensation for services rendered. The court shall set the actual compensation to be paid, taking into account:

The complexity of the property of the minor or person with a disability;

The amount of time the fiduciary spent in performing fiduciary duties;

Whether the fiduciary had to take time away from the fiduciary's normal occupation;

Whether the services provided the minor or person with a disability are those the fiduciary should normally have provided had there been no need for a fiduciary, and

Such other matters as the court deems appropriate.

No person, other than a person performing temporary fiduciary services while a proceeding is pending, who has not been appointed by the court to serve as a fiduciary shall receive any compensation for fiduciary services; however, this does not preclude payment for the necessary care of the minor or person with a disability.

No compensation to the fiduciary shall be paid without prior court approval.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 13; T.C.A. §34-11-112; Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Compensation of public guardian, §30-1-407.

34-1-113. Payments by fiduciary.

The fiduciary is entitled to pay from the property of the minor or person with a disability the costs of any required medical examination, the guardian ad litem fee, bond premium, court costs, attorney fees, fees for income tax preparation and court accountings, investment management fees, taxes or governmental charges for which the minor or person with a disability is obligated and such other expenses as the court determines are necessary for the fiduciary. The fiduciary shall not pay any attorney fee, guardian ad litem fee, fees for income tax preparation and court accountings or investment management fees until the amount of those fees is approved by the court.

Either prior to or after payment, the court may approve payments by the fiduciary from the property of the minor or person with a disability that are reasonable considering all relevant factors, are incurred by the fiduciary in good faith on behalf of the minor or person with a disability, and are intended to benefit or protect the minor or person with a disability or such person's property, whether or not an actual benefit or protection is ultimately in fact attained. Such requests and/or payments shall be reviewed by the court pursuant to fiduciary standards.

All other expenses, including those that do not comply with the requirements of subsection (b), may be approved by the court, either prior to or after payment, upon a determination that they are reasonable and:

They protected or benefited the minor or person with a disability or such person's property; or

That their payment is in the best interest of the minor or person with a disability.

For purposes of subsection (a), attorney fees shall include fees for preparing fiduciary fee applications and other related filings that are required to be submitted to the court including petitions to secure approval or reimbursement for any expenses paid by the fiduciary that meet the requirements of this section, provided that the amount of those fees is determined by the court to be reasonable in view of the services rendered.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the duty of the fiduciary appointed under this title shall not cease at the death of the person with a disability, but shall continue for the sole purpose of making reasonable and proper funeral arrangements for the disposition of the remains of the person with a disability, at death. Upon the death of the person with a disability, the fiduciary shall be allowed credits in the accounting for all reasonable expenses of the person with a disability's funeral. If the estate of the person with a disability has assets in an amount less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), the fiduciary may utilize this entire amount for payment of funeral expenses and will be given credit for the same in the final accounting.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 14; 1994, ch. 855, § 6; 1997, ch. 319, § 1; T.C.A. §34-11-113; Acts 2013, ch. 435, §§ 35, 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 319, § 2, provides that the amendment by that act shall apply to all appropriate expenditures incurred for the benefit of a minor or disabled person relative to guardianships created before, on or after May 29, 1997.

Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Attorney General Opinions. Duties and liabilities of district public guardian. OAG 13-36, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 37 (5/2/13).

34-1-114. Charging of costs of proceedings.

The costs of the proceedings, which are the court costs, the guardian ad litem fee and expenses incurred by the guardian ad litem in conducting the required investigations, the required medical examination costs, and the attorney's fee for the petitioner, may, in the court's discretion, be charged against the property of the respondent to the extent the respondent's property exceeds the supplemental security income eligibility limit, or to the petitioner or any other party, or partially to any one or more of them as determined in the court's discretion. In exercising its discretion to charge some or all of the costs against the respondent's property, the fact a conservator is appointed or would have been appointed but for an event beyond the petitioner's control is to be given special consideration. The guardian ad litem fee and the attorney's fee for the petitioner shall be established by the court. If a fiduciary is cited for failure to file an inventory or accounting, the costs incurred in citing the fiduciary, in the discretion of the court, may be charged to and collected from the cited fiduciary.

If the principal purpose for bringing the petition is to benefit the petitioner and there would otherwise be little, if any, need for the appointment of a fiduciary, the costs of the proceedings may be assessed against the petitioner, in the discretion of the court.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 15; 1994, ch. 855, § 7; 1997, ch. 407, § 4; T.C.A. §34-11-114; Acts 2012, ch. 917, § 1; 2013, ch. 435, § 21.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

34-1-115. Investments — Trust — Management plan — Court approval — Waiver.

A fiduciary is limited in its investments to the investments permitted by title 35, chapter 3 unless estate funds or property, or both, are transferred to a trust created pursuant to the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code, compiled in title 35, chapter 15. All funds held by a fiduciary shall be invested within forty-five (45) days of receipt of the funds unless otherwise allowed by the court.

Except as provided in subsection (d), at the hearing for the appointment of a fiduciary, the proposed fiduciary shall present an outline of the proposed property management plan for the respondent's property. If the proposed property management plan cannot be presented at the appointment hearing, the fiduciary shall submit the proposed property management plan to the court for approval before any property is invested. The purpose of the property management plan is to advise the court of the general type of property in which the respondent's property will be invested so the court will be assured the fiduciary will be making approved investments. The plan need not detail the individual asset or assets. For example, if the fiduciary plans to invest in certificates of deposit, the plan need only make that statement. It is not necessary to identify the individual institution or institutions whose certificates will be purchased.

Except as provided in subsections (d) and (f), each fiduciary shall request court approval to change the nature of the fiduciary's investment or investments. Compliance with the preceding sentence does not require court approval to change the same type of investment from one institution to another. For example, changing a certificate of deposit from one institution to another does not require court approval. Changing from one type of investment to another does require court approval. For example, changing from a certificate of deposit to traded stock would require court approval. If the fiduciary's property management plan describes proposed changes the fiduciary would make in response to economic and market conditions, the court may grant advance approval to make changes as described in the plan.

If the fiduciary is a financial institution, it shall not be required to seek court approval to change any investment.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no property management plan shall be required for the property of a minor or person with a disability if such property does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in value, unless, on the motion of any interested party, including the guardian ad litem, the court finds such plan would be in the best interest of such minor or person with a disability.

If no plan is filed pursuant to subdivision (e)(1), the fiduciary's first accounting and all subsequent accountings shall state how the funds of the estate are invested and how the fiduciary proposes that the funds will be invested for the coming year.

A fiduciary may petition the court to waive the requirement to request court approval to change the nature of any investment described in the property management plan as required by subsection (c). The waiver shall be within the court's sole discretion, and the court may revoke the waiver at any time. In deciding upon the waiver, the court may consider the fiduciary's history as a conservator, the length of conservatorship, the number of years the fiduciary has acted as a conservator, and any other factors that the court deems proper. The court may require the conservator to obtain professional advice or assistance regarding the investment of excess funds.

The court may approve the waiver request at a hearing for which all of the respondent's heirs at law or beneficiaries had notice and an opportunity to be heard regarding the proposed waiver and change of the nature of the fiduciary's investments.

If a waiver is approved by the court, the waiver shall be reduced to a written order. The fiduciary shall at all times maintain a minimum balance of funds sufficient to cover anticipated costs of care of the respondent for a minimum of three (3) years.

If a waiver is approved by the court, the fiduciary shall provide, in the accounting report required by § 34-1-111(b), a detailed outline of the investments made on behalf of the respondent and the current status of those investments. The purpose of the report is to assure the court that:

The fiduciary maintains the minimum balance prescribed by the court;

The fiduciary is responsibly investing the respondent's assets within the categories of investments approved in § 35-3-102;

The investment strategy demonstrates reasonable diversification to limit the risk of loss in vested funds;

There are no investments that would expose the respondent to any additional liability other than the possible depletion or loss of funds invested; and

The fiduciary keeps the court informed as to any changes in investments.

If funds are transferred to a trust as referenced in subsection (a), the fiduciary and trust protector are relieved of requirements under this title where trust assets, investments, and their financial nature require public disclosure or filing upon public record. A certification of trust outlined under § 35-15-1013 may be filed with the clerk of the court to show such trust is created. Such trust must be governed and administered by a qualified trustee as permitted by title 35. Further, the court clerk with personal jurisdiction over the person with a disability or minor must be named trust protector of said trust with powers prescribed by §§ 35-15-1201 — 35-15-1206.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 16; 1994, ch. 855, § 8; 1996, ch. 880, § 2; T.C.A. §34-11-115; Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 46; 2016, ch. 640, §§ 1, 2; 2019, ch. 340, §§ 6, 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment substituted “Except as provided in subsections (d) and (f)” for “Except as provided in subsection (d)” at the beginning of the first sentence of (c) and added (f).

The 2019 amendment added “unless estate funds or property, or both, are transferred to a trust created pursuant to the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code, compiled in title 35, chapter 15” to the end of the first sentence in (a), and added (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 640, § 4. March 23, 2016.

Acts 2019, ch. 340, § 20. May 10, 2019.

Law Reviews.

1996 Real Estate Legislation: What You Don't Know Can Hurt You (William R. Bruce), 32 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1996).

Collateral References.

Authorization by trust instrument of investment of trust funds in nonlegal investments. 78 A.L.R.2d 7.

Corporate stock, right of guardian to invest trust funds in. 12 A.L.R. 574, 122 A.L.R. 657, 78 A.L.R.2d 7.

Corporation of which he is officer or stockholder, guardian's purchase from, as voidable or as ground for surcharging his account. 105 A.L.R. 449.

Ownership by guardian in his own right of stock in a corporation in which he also holds stock in his fiduciary capacity. 106 A.L.R. 220, 161 A.L.R. 1039.

Power of guardian as to mortgaging infant's real property. 95 A.L.R. 839.

Protection of investment in stocks by submitting to voluntary assessment, power and duty of guardian as to. 104 A.L.R. 979.

Unauthorized securities coming into his hands, right of guardian to retain. 37 A.L.R. 559, 122 A.L.R. 801, 135 A.L.R. 1528.

34-1-116. Sale of property.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (d), no property of a minor or person with a disability may be sold without prior approval of the court that appointed the fiduciary.

Unless the fiduciary is holding tangible property for the benefit of a minor or person with a disability pursuant to the terms of a will, trust or other written document, the fiduciary has the authority to sell each item of tangible property with a fair market value of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or a motor vehicle without specific court approval.

No fiduciary, relative of a fiduciary, employee of a fiduciary, guardian ad litem or attorney for any party shall be a purchaser of property of the minor or person with a disability without court approval.

This section shall not apply to any fiduciary who is not required to file a property management plan or who has had its investment plans approved as part of its property management plan.

When the fiduciary seeks court approval for the sale of property, a copy of the pleading requesting approval of the sale shall be sent to the minor or person with a disability by certified mail with return receipt requested. Although not required, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 17; 1994, ch. 855, § 9; T.C.A. §34-11-116; Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Fees of clerks of courts administering probate matters, §§8-21-401,8-21-701,8-21-702.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 7.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Equitable Conversion, § 7; 14 Tenn. Juris., Guardian and Ward, §§ 8, 10; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, Intellectual Disabilities, and Other Incapacities, § 9; 20 Tenn. Juris., Partition, § 23.

Attorney General Opinions. Effect of appointment as conservator upon power of attorney to sell land, OAG 97-156, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 180 (11/14/97).

Collateral References.

Constitutionality of statute authorizing guardian to sell or lease land of ward. 4 A.L.R. 1552.

Exchange as within power of sale. 63 A.L.R. 1003.

Guardian's position as joint tenant of or successor to property in ward's estate as raising conflict of interest. 69 A.L.R.3d 1198.

Power of court to confirm sale of ward's property over objection of guardian. 43 A.L.R.2d 1445.

Sale of personal property without order of court. 108 A.L.R. 936.

Sale without order of court. 108 A.L.R. 936.

Subsequent appointment of guardian, as curing invalidity of prior sale of ward's property. 2 A.L.R. 1565.

34-1-117. Resignation of fiduciary — Transfer of fiduciary relationship.

A fiduciary may resign by submitting a written request to the court. If the court approves and the fiduciary submits a final accounting that is approved, the resignation of the fiduciary shall be effective on the date set by the court.

For minors, the court shall permit the transfer of the fiduciary relationship to another county, state or country if the court finds that either:

The minor and the serving Tennessee fiduciary have both moved to another county, state or country and the serving Tennessee fiduciary has been appointed the fiduciary in the other county, state or country; or

Only the minor has moved to another county, state or country and a fiduciary other than the serving Tennessee fiduciary has been appointed the fiduciary in the other county, state or country.

For minors, the procedure to seek the transfer of the fiduciary relationship jurisdiction to a court other than the Tennessee court currently supervising the fiduciary relationship shall be the following:

The fiduciary, who may be the serving Tennessee fiduciary or the fiduciary appointed in the other jurisdiction, shall file a sworn petition in the Tennessee court currently supervising the fiduciary relationship. The petition shall contain the following:

A brief statement of the reason or reasons for the removal of the minor from the county of the Tennessee court currently supervising the fiduciary relationship;

A certified copy of the document evidencing the appointment of a fiduciary for the minor in the new jurisdiction that is the place of actual residence of the minor;

An accounting of the minor's property up to the date of the filing of the petition. If the petitioning fiduciary is not the serving Tennessee fiduciary, the court may require the serving Tennessee fiduciary to submit the accounting;

A prayer for the removal of the fiduciary proceedings to the new jurisdiction; and

If appropriate, a prayer for the removal of the minor's property to the new jurisdiction;

Upon the hearing of the petition, the petitioning fiduciary shall provide the court with the following:

Satisfactory evidence that the minor and, if applicable, the serving Tennessee fiduciary have moved from the county of the Tennessee court currently supervising the fiduciary relationship and are actually residing in the new jurisdiction;

An accounting of the minor's property up to the date of the hearing. If the petitioning fiduciary is not the serving Tennessee fiduciary, the court may require the serving Tennessee fiduciary to submit the accounting;

A certified copy of the order of the court appointing the fiduciary in the new jurisdiction; and

A copy of the bond given by the fiduciary in the new jurisdiction with a certificate of the clerk of the court that the bond was signed;

If upon the hearing the court is satisfied with the sufficiency of the evidence presented and the court determines that it is in the best interests of the minor the court shall:

Order the removal of the fiduciary proceedings and, if applicable, the minor's property to the jurisdiction of the actual residence of the minor; and

Discharge the Tennessee fiduciary and the fiduciary's surety on the bond in the Tennessee proceedings; and

Upon the granting of the order, the court shall transfer to the appropriate court in the new jurisdiction a copy of the accounting of the serving Tennessee fiduciary and all records pertaining to the fiduciary relationship.

For a disabled adult person, the court shall permit the transfer of the fiduciary relationship to another county, if the court finds that either:

The disabled adult person and the serving Tennessee fiduciary have both moved to another county, and the serving Tennessee fiduciary has been appointed the fiduciary in the other county; or

Only the disabled adult person has moved to another county, and a fiduciary other than the serving Tennessee fiduciary has been appointed the fiduciary in the other county.

For a disabled adult person, the procedure to seek the transfer of the fiduciary relationship jurisdiction to a court in another county other than the Tennessee court currently supervising the fiduciary relationship shall be the following:

The fiduciary, who may be the serving Tennessee fiduciary or the fiduciary appointed in the other county, shall file a sworn petition in the Tennessee court currently supervising the fiduciary relationship. The petition shall contain the following:

A brief statement of the reason or reasons for the removal of the person with a disability from the county of the Tennessee court currently supervising the fiduciary relationship;

A certified copy of the document evidencing the appointment of a fiduciary for the person with a disability in the new jurisdiction that is the place of actual residence of the minor or person with a disability;

An accounting of the disabled adult person's property up to the date of the filing of the petition. If the petitioning fiduciary is not the serving Tennessee fiduciary, the court may require the serving Tennessee fiduciary to submit the accounting;

A prayer for the removal of the fiduciary proceedings to the new jurisdiction; and

If appropriate, a prayer for the removal of the disabled adult person's property to the new jurisdiction;

Upon the hearing of the petition, the petitioning fiduciary shall provide the court with the following:

Satisfactory evidence that the disabled adult person and, if applicable, the serving Tennessee fiduciary have moved from the county of the Tennessee court currently supervising the fiduciary relationship and are actually residing in the new jurisdiction;

An accounting of the person with a disability's property up to the date of the hearing. If the petitioning fiduciary is not the serving Tennessee fiduciary, the court may require the serving Tennessee fiduciary to submit the accounting;

A certified copy of the order of the court appointing the fiduciary in the new jurisdiction; and

A copy of the bond given by the fiduciary in the new jurisdiction with a certificate of the clerk of the court that the bond was signed;

If upon the hearing the court is satisfied with the sufficiency of the evidence presented and the court determines it is in the best interests of the person with a disability, the court shall:

Order the removal of the fiduciary proceedings and, if applicable, the adult person with a disability's property to the jurisdiction of the actual residence of the adult person with a disability; and

Discharge the Tennessee fiduciary and the fiduciary's surety on the bond in the Tennessee proceedings; and

Upon the granting of the order, the court shall transfer to the appropriate court in the new jurisdiction a copy of the accounting of the serving Tennessee fiduciary and all records pertaining to the fiduciary relationship.

Other issues relating to subject matter jurisdiction of conservatorships, guardianships and protective proceedings shall be governed by chapter 8 of this title.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 18; 1994, ch. 855, § 10; T.C.A. §34-11-117; Acts 2010, ch. 817, § 2; 2013, ch. 435, §§ 39, 46; 2017, ch. 290, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “chapter 8 of this title” for “chapter 14 of this title” at the end of (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 16. July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Resignation of representatives, §§30-1-112,30-1-113.

Law Reviews.

Attorney and Client — Liability of Attorney for Misdirection of Minor's Funds, 8 Tenn. L. Rev. 191 (1930).

34-1-118. Persons receiving property — Receipt for property — Filing.

Whenever a fiduciary distributes property of a minor or person with a disability, the person receiving the property of the minor or person with a disability from the fiduciary shall sign a receipt for the property, which receipt shall be filed with the fiduciary's next accounting.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 19; T.C.A. §34-11-118; Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

34-1-119. Standby fiduciary.

At the request of the petitioner, the fiduciary, or on the court's own motion, a standby fiduciary may be appointed by the court to take the place of the fiduciary on a temporary or, if necessary, on a permanent basis. The standby fiduciary shall have the same powers, rights and obligations as the fiduciary.

When it is necessary for the standby fiduciary to function, the regular fiduciary shall notify the court or other interested party of the need for the services of the standby fiduciary and the anticipated duration of the need for the services. On receipt of the notice, the court shall enter an order authorizing the standby fiduciary to function in the place of the fiduciary. The order shall state the duration of the standby fiduciary's authority and shall suspend the authority of the fiduciary. If the fiduciary is bonded, the standby fiduciary must also be bonded in the same amount as the fiduciary. Under no circumstance can the fiduciary and standby fiduciary be simultaneously empowered to act.

Although there is no current need for the services of a fiduciary:

The custodial parent or parents or the person designated by the custodial parent or parents of a minor child or children may petition in accordance with chapter 2 of this title; or

Any adult may petition for the adult in accordance with chapter 3 of this title for the appointment of a standby fiduciary. The standby fiduciary authorized by this subsection (c) may be appointed without the necessity of the appointment of a fiduciary. The court shall respond to the petition as though it were a petition for the appointment of a currently active fiduciary so that all questions concerning the appropriateness of the proposed fiduciary or the property management plan are resolved at the hearing on the petition, which action will minimize delay in activating the standby fiduciary when necessary. If appointed, the court shall define in the order of appointment the circumstances under which the standby fiduciary shall become an active fiduciary and the actions that the standby fiduciary shall take to notify the court of the need for the standby fiduciary to become active. If the court determines there is a need for an active fiduciary, the court shall issue an order authorizing the standby fiduciary to function which order shall contain such other authority or restriction, consistent with this chapter, and chapters 2 and 3 of this title, as the court determines is in the best interest of the minor or person with a disability. In considering a petition for the appointment of a standby fiduciary, the court shall try to minimize the costs to the petitioner to the extent the court determines it is in the best interest of the minor or the person with a potential disability.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 20; 1997, ch. 407, § 5; T.C.A. §34-11-119; Acts 2013, ch. 435, §§ 22, 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

34-1-120. When people may be appointed fiduciary — Eligible persons.

No personal representative of an estate, any part of which is distributable to a minor, except a parent, grandparent, sibling of the minor or person named by the testator to be guardian, shall be appointed the fiduciary for the minor until the personal representative has first settled its accounts as personal representative. No personal representative of an estate, any part of which is distributable to a person with a disability, except a parent, spouse, child, grandchild, grandparent or sibling of the person with a disability, shall be appointed the fiduciary for the person with a disability until the personal representative has first settled its accounts as personal representative.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 21; 1994, ch. 855, § 11; 1997, ch. 407, § 6; 1999, ch. 491, § 7; T.C.A. §34-11-120; Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

34-1-121. Powers of court — Additional actions — Waiver of requirements — Compromise.

The court has broad discretion to require additional actions not specified in this chapter, and chapters 2 and 3 of this title as the court deems in the best interests of the minor or person with a disability and the property of the minor or the person with a disability. The court also has discretion to waive requirements specified in this chapter, and chapters 2 and 3 of this title if the court finds it is in the best interests of the minor or person with a disability to waive such requirements, particularly in those instances where strict compliance would be too costly or place an undue burden on the fiduciary or the minor or the person with a disability.

In any action, claim, or suit in which a minor or person with a disability is a party or in any case of personal injury to a minor or person with a disability caused by the alleged wrongful act of another, the court in which the action, claim, or suit is pending, or the court supervising the fiduciary relationship if a fiduciary has been appointed, has the power to approve and confirm a compromise of the matters in controversy on behalf of the minor or person with a disability. If the court deems the compromise to be in the best interest of the minor or person with a disability, any order or decree approving and confirming the compromise shall be binding on the minor or person with a disability.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 22; 1994, ch. 855, § 12; 2000, ch. 610, § 1; T.C.A. §34-11-121; Acts 2013, ch. 435, §§ 40, 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

34-1-122. Distributions to persons other than minor — Gift program.

In considering expenditures of income or principal of the property of the minor or person with a disability, the court may authorize distributions to persons other than the minor or person with a disability if the court determines the expenditures are in the best interests of the minor or person with a disability. In making its decision, the court may consider whatever information the court deems relevant to its decision, keeping in mind its primary responsibility is for the care and maintenance of the minor or person with a disability and the person's property. No gift program shall be authorized unless there is evidence the person with a disability established a gift program prior to becoming a person with a disability or, even though the person with a disability had not established a gift program, a gift program would reduce the person with a disability's tax liability and would not jeopardize the person with a disability's care and long-term well-being.

Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 23; T.C.A. §34-11-122; Acts 2013, ch. 435, §§ 41, 46.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 435, § 48 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to actions commenced on or after July 1, 2013.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee's Creative Solution: Estate Planning After Incompetence (Dan. W. Holbrook), 35 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 13 (1999).